ja: 適合ボールタイプ: 野球; ゴルフ; ソフトボール; テニス; ウィッフル; その他
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta žoge: Bejzbol; Golf; Softball; Tenis; Wiffle; Drugo
nl: Compatibel baltype: Baseball; Golf; Softbalballen; Tennis; Slagbal; Andere
fr: Type de balle compatible: Base-ball; Golf; Softballs; Tennis; Wiffle; Autre
vi: Loại bóng tương thích: Bóng chày; Gôn; Bóng mềm; Quần vợt; Bóng lỗ; Khác
de: Kompatibler Balltyp: Baseball; Golf; Softball-Bälle; Tennis; Wiffle; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Съвместим тип топка: Бейзбол; Голф; Софтбол; Тенис; Wiffle; Други
en: Compatible ball type: Baseball; Golf; Softballs; Tennis; Wiffle; Other
lt-LT: Suderinamas kamuoliuko tipas: Beisbolas; Golfas; Softbolas; Tenisas; „Wiffle“; Kita
fi: Yhteensopiva pallotyyppi: Pesäpallo; Golf; Softball-pallot; Tennis; Wiffle; Muu
cs: Kompatibilní typ míčku: Baseball; Golf; Softbalové míčky; Tenis; Wiffle; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de bola compatível: Beisebol; Golf; Softball; Tênis; Wiffle; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de bola compatível: Basebol; Golfe; Bolas de softbol; Ténis; Wiffle; Outro
da: Kompatibel kugletype: Baseball; Golf; Bolde til softball; Tennis; Wiffle; Andet
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta loptice: Bejzbol; Golf; Loptice za softbol; Tenis; Wiffle; Ostalo
pl: Zgodny typ piłki: Baseball; Golf; Softball; Tenis; Wiffle; Inne
nb: Kompatibel balltype: Baseball; Golf; Softballer; Tennis; Wiffle; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de minge compatibil: Baseball; Golf; Mingi softball; Tenis; Wiffle; Altele
zh-CN: 适用球类型: 棒球; 高尔夫用品; 垒球; 网球用品; 威浮球; 其他
hu: Kompatibilis labda típusa: Baseball; Golf; Softball; Tenisz; Wiffle; Egyéb
ko: 호환 가능한 공 유형: 야구; 골프; 소프트볼; 테니스; 위플; 기타
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ loptičky: Bejzbal; Golf; Softbalky; Tenisový; Wiffle; Iné
el: Συμβατός τύπος μπάλας: Μπέιζμπολ; Γκολφ; Σόφτμπολ; Τένις; Wiffle; Άλλο
sv: Kompatibel bolltyp: Baseboll; Golf; Softballbollar; Tennis; Wiffle; Övrigt
tr: Uyumlu Top Tipi: Beyzbol; Golf; Softball Topları; Tenis; Wiffle; Diğer
ru: Совместимые типы мячей: Бейсбол; Гольф; Софтбольные мячи; Теннис; Виффл; Другое
it: Tipo di palla compatibile: Baseball; Golf; Softball; Tennis; Wiffle; Altro
zh-TW: 相容球型: 棒球; 高爾夫球; 壘球; 網球; 威浮球; 其他
th: ประเภทบอลที่รองรับ: เบสบอล; กอล์ฟ; ซอฟท์บอล; เทนนิส; วิฟเฟิล; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de pelota compatible: Béisbol; Golf; Pelotas de sóftbol; Tenis; Wiffle; Otros